Florida, session 2026, HB157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1012.988, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1012.988 School Teacher Training and Mentoring Program.—
(1) The School Teacher Training and Mentoring Program is
established within the Department of Education. The purpose of
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb157-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 157 2026
the program is to increase the effectiveness and involvement of
classroom teachers and improve student achievement, classroom
management, and excellence in the state's public schools.
(2)(a) School districts and charter schools may place
retired classroom teachers or current classroom teachers in
schools earning a grade of "D" or "F" to act as teacher mentors
to:
1. New classroom teachers;
2. Classroom teachers who are rated as needs improvement,
developing, or unsatisfactory on the prior year's performance
evaluation under s. 1012.34; or
3. Classroom teachers identified by the school
administrator as struggling with behavior management within the
classroom.
(b) Each teacher mentor selected by the school district,
charter school, or charter management organization must have:
1. At least 3 years of teaching experience in
prekindergarten through grade 12.
2. Earned a highly effective rating on most recent
performance evaluation under s. 1012.34.
(c) Each teacher mentor may receive a stipend up to
$3,000. The teacher mentor may work with multiple classroom
teachers.
(3) The Department of Education shall establish program
standards and a standard contract template for the teacher
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb157-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 157 2026
mentor and mentee which outlines the responsibilities of each
person and establishes the framework and goals of the program.
(4) Each teacher mentor must:
(a) Not have an official management relationship with his
or her mentee.
(b) Provide direction, advice, and a neutral sounding
board to his or her mentee.
(c) Maintain confidentiality, unless prohibited by law.
(d) Not have a personal agenda other than assisting his or
her mentee in developing and reaching the mentee's goals.
(e) Help his or her mentee in developing skills and
expertise, including drawing upon the teacher mentor's own
personal experiences.
(5) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to
administer this section.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of section
1011.62, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1011.62 Funds for operation of schools.—If the annual
allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each
district for operation of schools is not determined in the
annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing
the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as
follows:
(7) EDUCATIONAL ENRICHMENT ALLOCATION.—
(a) The educational enrichment allocation is created to
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb157-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 157 2026
assist school districts in providing educational enrichment
activities and services that support and increase the academic
achievement of students in grades kindergarten through 12.
Educational enrichment activities and services may be provided
in a manner and at any time during or beyond the regular 180-day
term identified by the school district as being the most
effective and efficient way to best help the student progress
from grade to grade and graduate from high school. Funds from
the educational enrichment allocation may be used for the School
Teacher Training and Mentoring Program under s. 1012.988. For
fiscal year 2023-2024, the educational enrichment allocation
shall consist of a base amount as specified in the General
Appropriations Act. Beginning in fiscal year 2024-2025, the
educational enrichment allocation shall consist of the base
amount that includes a workload adjustment based on changes in
the unweighted full-time equivalent membership. Beginning in
fiscal year 2025-2026, and each year thereafter, the statewide
average base amount as specified in the General Appropriations
Act shall be used for any new educational entity funded in the
Florida Education Finance Program.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb157-01-c1